ani_verbs_lexicon.lexd
кьвагьуноллу<V>:кьвагьун[causative]                         # стрелять
гелоллу<V>:гел[causative]                                   # вешать
чIаболлу<V>:чIаб[causative]                                 # гнуть
бажаруноллу<V>:бажарун[causative]                           # мочь
танноллу<V>:танн[causative]                                 # рвать
чаболлу<V>:чаб[causative]                                   # сыпать
ссороллу<V>:ссор[causative]                                 # переворачивать
гьебцIоллу<V>:гьебцI[causative]                             # поднимать
ароллу<V>:ар[causative]                                     # рубить
абжоллу<V>:абж[causative]                                   # смешивать
оболлу<V>:об[causative]                                     # макать
рокъоллу<V>:рокъ[causative]                                 # мирить
бучIчIоллу<V>:бучIчI[causative]                             # мстить
чIчIуроллу<V>:чIчIур[causative]                             # сплющиваться
оххонну<V>:охх[nasal,causative]                             # кипятить
куликонну<V>:кулик[nasal,causative]                         # щекотать
бисонну<V>:бис[nasal,causative]                             # находить
къуллонну<V>:къулл[nasal,causative]                         # горбиться
оххинну<V>:охх[nasal,npst-i]                                # кипеть
кьихинну<V>:кьих[nasal,npst-i]                              # засыпать
гьалчIинну<V>:гьалчI[nasal,npst-i]                          # смотреть
кьихинну<V>:кьих[nasal,transitive,npst-i]                   # спать
рокъинну<V>:рокъ[nasal,transitive,npst-i]                   # закрывать
архинну<V>:арх[nasal,transitive,npst-i]                     # открываться
басинну<V>:бас[nasal,transitive,npst-i]                     # мерить
архинну<V>:арх[nasal,transitive,npst-i]                     # открывать
басинну<V>:бас[nasal,transitive,npst-i]                     # взвешивать
сукIунну<V>:сукI[nasal,transitive,npst-u]                   # складывать
бикIкIунну<V>:бикIкIу[nasal,transitive]                     # глотать
хъухъанну<V>:хъухъа[nasal,transitive]                       # пилить
рацIцIинну<V>:рацIцIи[nasal,transitive]                     # спрашивать
хьваъунну<V>:хьваъу[nasal,transitive]                       # махать
байбихьунну<V>:байбихьу[nasal,transitive]                   # начинаться
бикьинну<V>:бикьи[nasal,transitive]                         # надевать
берхьунну<V>:берхьу[nasal,transitive]                       # топтать
гуккунну<V>:гукку[nasal,transitive]                         # обманывать
туркIунну<V>:туркIу[nasal,transitive]                       # дергать
хIапунну<V>:хIапу[nasal]                                    # лаять
зиркъунну<V>:зиркъу[nasal]                                  # скрипеть
чIаланну<V>:чIала[nasal]                                    # надоедать
хъуршунну<V>:хъуршу[nasal]                                  # ползать
щаккунну<V>:щакку[nasal]                                    # подозревать
звархунну<V>:зварху[nasal]                                  # звенеть
эбчунну<V>:эбчу[nasal]                                      # чихать
гугарунну<V>:гугару[nasal]                                  # бороться
хьвадунну<V>:хьваду[nasal]                                  # двигаться
кьвагьунну<V>:кьвагьу[nasal]                                # лопаться
къабшунну<V>:къабшу[nasal]                                  # мигать
къабшунну<V>:къабщу[nasal]                                  # моргать
пулхунну<V>:пулху[nasal]                                    # пузыриться
эдеъунну<V>:эдеъу[nasal]                                    # спешить
даъбадунну<V>:даъбаду[nasal]                                # спорить
кьватIунну<V>:кьватIу[nasal]                                # трескаться
ургъунну<V>:ургъу[nasal]                                    # думать
хIалтIунну<V>:хIалтIу[nasal]                                # работать
чIунтунну<V>:чIунту[nasal]                                  # ветшать
гвангъунну<V>:гвангъу[nasal]                                # вспыхивать
хъитIунну<V>:хъитIу[nasal]                                  # нагло смотреть
чIугьунну<V>:чIугьу[nasal]                                  # гордиться
къвакIунну<V>:къвакIу[nasal]                                # крепнуть
гьаджатунну<V>:гьаджату[nasal]                              # понадобиться
бежери<V>:беж[thematic-a,transitive]                        # печь (глагол)
гъуммери<V>:гъумм[thematic-i,transitive]                    # бадаться
цIатери<V>:цIат[thematic-i,transitive]                      # жечь
кустери<V>:куст[thematic-i,transitive]                      # искать
хханнери<V>:хханн[thematic-i,transitive]                    # косить
букъери<V>:букъ[thematic-i,transitive]                      # кроить
ламмери<V>:ламм[thematic-i,transitive]                      # лизать
маъушери<V>:маъуш[thematic-i,transitive]                    # мяукать
хъварери<V>:хъвар[thematic-i,transitive]                    # писать
бещери<V>:бещ[thematic-i,transitive]                        # ткать
кьаннери<V>:кьанн[thematic-i,transitive]                    # тянуть
баъери<V>:баъ[thematic-i,transitive]                        # читать
хъеллери<V>:хъелл[thematic-i,transitive]                    # чесать
пудери<V>:пуд[thematic-i,transitive]                        # дуть
цIцIуннери<V>:цIцIунн[thematic-i,transitive]                # сосать
джидери<V>:джид[thematic-i,transitive]                      # делать
чIаммери<V>:чIамм[thematic-i,transitive]                    # жевать
хварери<V>:хвар[thematic-i,transitive]                      # копать
кIвкIварери<V>:кIвкIвар[thematic-i,transitive]              # месить
ихохъери<V>:ихохъ[thematic-i,transitive]                    # молоть
бекьери<V>:бекь[thematic-i,transitive]                      # пахать
къирери<V>:къир[thematic-i,transitive]                      # стричь
рихъери<V>:рихъ[thematic-i,transitive]                      # царапать
хъеллери<V>:хъелл[thematic-i,transitive]                    # царапать
пунхъишери<V>:пунхъиш[thematic-i,transitive]                # брызгать
шаммери<V>:шамм[thematic-i,transitive]                      # бросать
бушери<V>:буш[thematic-i,transitive]                        # красить
къиннери<V>:къинн[thematic-i,transitive]                    # мять
къиройдери<V>:къиройд[thematic-i,transitive]                # ранить
лъуннери<V>:лъунн[thematic-i,transitive]                    # сморкаться
цIцIиммери<V>:цIцIимм[thematic-i,transitive]                # щипать
рулIери<V>:рулI[thematic-i,transitive]                      # говорить
къорери<V>:къор[thematic-i,transitive]                      # петь
къорери<V>:къор[thematic-i,transitive]                      # позвать
къорери<V>:къор[thematic-i,transitive]                      # позвонить
тIиннери<V>:тIинн[thematic-i,transitive]                    # лить
ходери<V>:ход[thematic-i,transitive]                        # просить
хоммери<V>:хомм[thematic-i,transitive]                      # храпеть
бецIцIомийдери<V>:бецIцIомийд[thematic-i,transitive]        # чистить
ханнери<V>:ханн[thematic-i,transitive]                      # брить
иччери<V>:ичч[thematic-i,transitive]                        # давать
кIаммери<V>:кIамм[thematic-i,transitive]                    # есть
роквери<V>:рокв[thematic-i,transitive]                      # жать
шаншуннери<V>:шаншунн[thematic-i,transitive]                # нюхать
тудери<V>:туд[thematic-i,transitive]                        # плевать
щоммери<V>:щомм[thematic-i,transitive]                      # свистеть
джабери<V>:джаб[thematic-i,transitive]                      # убивать
чIчIабери<V>:чIчIаб[thematic-i,transitive]                  # убивать
щоммери<V>:щомм[thematic-i,transitive]                      # шипеть
чихамшери<V>:чихамш[thematic-i,transitive]                  # полоскать
гьацIайдери<V>:гьацIайд[thematic-i,transitive]              # белить
бекъашери<V>:бекъаш[thematic-i,transitive]                  # грабить
чIерлIери<V>:чIерлI[thematic-i,transitive]                  # делить
цIеннери<V>:цIенн[thematic-i,transitive]                    # защищать
кьаннери<V>:кьанн[thematic-i,transitive]                    # курить
хварери<V>:хвар[thematic-i,transitive]                      # полоть
хъеллери<V>:хъелл[thematic-i,transitive]                    # скоблить
кIутIишери<V>:кIутIиш[thematic-i,transitive]                # стучать
гьакъийдери<V>:гьакъийд[thematic-i,transitive]              # унижать
цIиннолъери<V>:цIиннолъ[thematic-i,transitive]              # учить
къорери<V>:къор[thematic-i,transitive]                      # звать
сагъийдери<V>:сагъийд[thematic-i,transitive]                # лечить
цIцIадери<V>:цIцIад[thematic-i,transitive]                  # пить
каннери<V>:канн[thematic-i,transitive]                      # тесать
лъурери<V>:лъур[thematic-i,transitive]                      # трясти
къаммери<V>:къамм[thematic-i,transitive]                    # кусать
кудери<V>:куд[thematic-i,transitive]                        # просеивать
бекъашолери<V>:бекъашол[thematic-i,transitive]              # прятать
рихъери<V>:рихъ[thematic-i,transitive]                      # свежевать
джабери<V>:джаб[thematic-i,transitive]                      # ударять
гъуммери<V>:гъумм[thematic-i,transitive]                    # бодаться
кьаннери<V>:кьанн[thematic-i,transitive]                    # взвешивать
цIцIурери<V>:цIцIур[thematic-i,transitive]                  # выжимать
лъарери<V>:лъар[thematic-i,transitive]                      # гладить
иччери<V>:ичч[thematic-i,transitive]                        # дарить
сабсашери<V>:сабсаш[thematic-i,transitive]                  # ковыряться
хъватIишери<V>:хъватIиш[thematic-i,transitive]              # ковыряться
хъубийдери<V>:хъубийд[thematic-i,transitive]                # пачкать
чурукийдери<V>:чурукийд[thematic-i,transitive]              # пачкать
хъиннери<V>:хъинн[thematic-i,transitive]                    # дробить
шарери<V>:шар[thematic-i,transitive]                        # разбрасывать
шаршашери<V>:шаршаш[thematic-i,transitive]                  # разбрасывать
бечIуйдери<V>:бечIуйд[thematic-i,transitive]                # разгружать
мичIчIирийдери<V>:мичIчIирийд[thematic-i,transitive]        # прореживать
мичIчIируйдери<V>:мичIчIируйд[thematic-i,transitive]        # прореживать
каннери<V>:канн[thematic-i,transitive]                      # строгать
оббадери<V>:оббад[thematic-i,transitive]                    # целовать
цIцIоммери<V>:цIцIомм[thematic-i,transitive]                # целовать
палбукъери<V>:палбукъ[thematic-i,transitive]                # гадать
ухIудери<V>:ухIуд[thematic-i]                               # кашлять
къиркъидери<V>:къиркъид[thematic-i]                         # скрипеть
коллери<V>:колл[thematic-i]                                 # плавать
ирери<V>:ир[thematic-i]                                     # вздрагивать
турери<V>:тур[thematic-i]                                   # гнить
цIиннери<V>:цIинн[thematic-i]                               # знать
уᵸъуᵸдери<V>:уᵸъуᵸд[thematic-i]                             # кукарекать
гьуммедери<V>:гьуммед[thematic-i]                           # мычать
гъурери<V>:гъур[thematic-i]                                 # скользить
анлъери<V>:анлъ[thematic-i]                                 # слышать
гьеллери<V>:гьелл[thematic-i]                               # бегать
къиннери<V>:къинн[thematic-i]                               # жадничать
гьиᵸрилъери<V>:гьиᵸрилъ[thematic-i]                         # краснеть
кIвахIаллъери<V>:кIвахIаллъ[thematic-i]                     # лениться
олохъанлъери<V>:олохъанлъ[thematic-i]                       # молодеть
зигардери<V>:зигард[thematic-i]                             # стонать
гъаргъадери<V>:гъаргъад[thematic-i]                         # блеять
багIадери<V>:багIад[thematic-i]                             # блеять
сирери<V>:сир[thematic-i]                                   # бояться
вугъери<V>:вугъ[thematic-i]                                 # останавливаться
